Utah statutes.
48-2c-1504.   No limits on regulating board.
Nothing in this chapter restricts or limits in any manner the authority and
duty of the regulating board to license individuals rendering professional
services or the practice of the profession that is within the jurisdiction of
the regulating board, notwithstanding that the individual is a member,
manager, or employee of a company and rendering the professional services or
engaging in the practice of the profession through the company.
